intl/locales/bg/hyphenation/hyph_bg.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
1а1
1б1
1в1
1г1
1д1
1е1
1ж1
1з1
1и1
1й1
1к1
1л1
1м1
1н1
1о1
1п1
1р1
1с1
1т1
1у1
1ф1
1х1
1ц1
1ч1
1ш1
1щ1
1ъ1
1ю1
1я1
б4а1
б4е1
б4и1
б4о1
б4у1
б4ъ1
б4ю1
б4я1
в4а1
в4е1
в4и1
в4о1
в4у1
в4ъ1
в4ю1
в4я1
г4а1
г4е1
г4и1
г4о1
г4у1
г4ъ1
г4ю1
г4я1
д4а1
д4е1
д4и1
д4о1
д4у1
д4ъ1
д4ю1
д4я1
ж4а1
ж4е1
ж4и1
ж4о1
ж4у1
ж4ъ1
ж4ю1
ж4я1
з4а1
з4е1
з4и1
з4о1
з4у1
з4ъ1
з4ю1
з4я1
й4а1
й4е1
й4и1
й4о1
й4у1
й4ъ1
й4ю1
й4я1
к4а1
к4е1
к4и1
к4о1
к4у1
к4ъ1
к4ю1
к4я1
л4а1
л4е1
л4и1
л4о1
л4у1
л4ъ1
л4ю1
л4я1
м4а1
м4е1
м4и1
м4о1
м4у1
м4ъ1
м4ю1
м4я1
н4а1
н4е1
н4и1
н4о1
н4у1
н4ъ1
н4ю1
н4я1
п4а1
п4е1
п4и1
п4о1
п4у1
п4ъ1
п4ю1
п4я1
р4а1
р4е1
р4и1
р4о1
р4у1
р4ъ1
р4ю1
р4я1
с4а1
с4е1
с4и1
с4о1
с4у1
с4ъ1
с4ю1
с4я1
т4а1
т4е1
т4и1
т4о1
т4у1
т4ъ1
т4ю1
т4я1
ф4а1
ф4е1
ф4и1
ф4о1
ф4у1
ф4ъ1
ф4ю1
ф4я1
х4а1
х4е1
х4и1
х4о1
х4у1
х4ъ1
х4ю1
х4я1
ц4а1
ц4е1
ц4и1
ц4о1
ц4у1
ц4ъ1
ц4ю1
ц4я1
ч4а1
ч4е1
ч4и1
ч4о1
ч4у1
ч4ъ1
ч4ю1
ч4я1
ш4а1
ш4е1
ш4и1
ш4о1
ш4у1
ш4ъ1
ш4ю1
ш4я1
щ4а1
щ4е1
щ4и1
щ4о1
щ4у1
щ4ъ1
щ4ю1
щ4я1
ь4а1
ь4е1
ь4и1
ь4о1
ь4у1
ь4ъ1
ь4ю1
ь4я1
4б3б4
2б3в2
2б3г2
2б3д2
2б3ж2
2б3з2
2б3й2
2б3к2
2б3л2
2б3м2
2б3н2
2б3п2
2б3р2
2б3с2
2б3т2
2б3ф2
2б3х2
2б3ц2
2б3ч2
2б3ш2
2б3щ2
2в3б2
4в3в4
2в3г2
2в3д2
2в3ж2
2в3з2
2в3й2
2в3к2
2в3л2
2в3м2
2в3н2
2в3п2
2в3р2
2в3с2
2в3т2
2в3ф2
2в3х2
2в3ц2
2в3ч2
2в3ш2
2в3щ2
2г3б2
2г3в2
4г3г4
2г3д2
2г3ж2
2г3з2
2г3й2
2г3к2
2г3л2
2г3м2
2г3н2
2г3п2
2г3р2
2г3с2
2г3т2
2г3ф2
2г3х2
2г3ц2
2г3ч2
2г3ш2
2г3щ2
2д3б2
2д3в2
2д3г2
4д3д4
3д4ж1
2д3з2
2д3й2
2д3к2
2д3л2
2д3м2
2д3н2
2д3п2
2д3р2
2д3с2
2д3т2
2д3ф2
2д3х2
2д3ц2
2д3ч2
2д3ш2
2д3щ2
2ж3б2
2ж3в2
2ж3г2
2ж3д2
4ж3ж4
2ж3з2
2ж3й2
2ж3к2
2ж3л2
2ж3м2
2ж3н2
2ж3п2
2ж3р2
2ж3с2
2ж3т2
2ж3ф2
2ж3х2
2ж3ц2
2ж3ч2
2ж3ш2
2ж3щ2
2з3б2
2з3в2
2з3г2
2з3д2
2з3ж2
4з3з4
2з3й2
2з3к2
2з3л2
2з3м2
2з3н2
2з3п2
2з3р2
2з3с2
2з3т2
2з3ф2
2з3х2
2з3ц2
2з3ч2
2з3ш2
2з3щ2
2й3б2
2й3в2
2й3г2
2й3д2
2й3ж2
2й3з2
4й3й4
2й3к2
2й3л2
2й3м2
2й3н2
2й3п2
2й3р2
2й3с2
2й3т2
2й3ф2
2й3х2
2й3ц2
2й3ч2
2й3ш2
2й3щ2
2к3б2
2к3в2
2к3г2
2к3д2
2к3ж2
2к3з2
2к3й2
4к3к4
2к3л2
2к3м2
2к3н2
2к3п2
2к3р2
2к3с2
2к3т2
2к3ф2
2к3х2
2к3ц2
2к3ч2
2к3ш2
2к3щ2
2л3б2
2л3в2
2л3г2
2л3д2
2л3ж2
2л3з2
2л3й2
2л3к2
4л3л4
2л3м2
2л3н2
2л3п2
2л3р2
2л3с2
2л3т2
2л3ф2
2л3х2
2л3ц2
2л3ч2
2л3ш2
2л3щ2
2м3б2
2м3в2
2м3г2
2м3д2
2м3ж2
2м3з2
2м3й2
2м3к2
2м3л2
4м3м4
2м3н2
2м3п2
2м3р2
2м3с2
2м3т2
2м3ф2
2м3х2
2м3ц2
2м3ч2
2м3ш2
2м3щ2
2н3б2
2н3в2
2н3г2
2н3д2
2н3ж2
2н3з2
2н3й2
2н3к2
2н3л2
2н3м2
4н3н4
2н3п2
2н3р2
2н3с2
2н3т2
2н3ф2
2н3х2
2н3ц2
2н3ч2
2н3ш2
2н3щ2
2п3б2
2п3в2
2п3г2
2п3д2
2п3ж2
2п3з2
2п3й2
2п3к2
2п3л2
2п3м2
2п3н2
4п3п4
2п3р2
2п3с2
2п3т2
2п3ф2
2п3х2
2п3ц2
2п3ч2
2п3ш2
2п3щ2
2р3б2
2р3в2
2р3г2
2р3д2
2р3ж2
2р3з2
2р3й2
2р3к2
2р3л2
2р3м2
2р3н2
2р3п2
4р3р4
2р3с2
2р3т2
2р3ф2
2р3х2
2р3ц2
2р3ч2
2р3ш2
2р3щ2
2с3б2
2с3в2
2с3г2
2с3д2
2с3ж2
2с3з2
2с3й2
2с3к2
2с3л2
2с3м2
2с3н2
2с3п2
2с3р2
4с3с4
2с3т2
2с3ф2
2с3х2
2с3ц2
2с3ч2
2с3ш2
2с3щ2
2т3б2
2т3в2
2т3г2
2т3д2
2т3ж2
2т3з2
2т3й2
2т3к2
2т3л2
2т3м2
2т3н2
2т3п2
2т3р2
2т3с2
4т3т4
2т3ф2
2т3х2
2т3ц2
2т3ч2
2т3ш2
2т3щ2
2ф3б2
2ф3в2
2ф3г2
2ф3д2
2ф3ж2
2ф3з2
2ф3й2
2ф3к2
2ф3л2
2ф3м2
2ф3н2
2ф3п2
2ф3р2
2ф3с2
2ф3т2
4ф3ф4
2ф3х2
2ф3ц2
2ф3ч2
2ф3ш2
2ф3щ2
2х3б2
2х3в2
2х3г2
2х3д2
2х3ж2
2х3з2
2х3й2
2х3к2
2х3л2
2х3м2
2х3н2
2х3п2
2х3р2
2х3с2
2х3т2
2х3ф2
4х3х4
2х3ц2
2х3ч2
2х3ш2
2х3щ2
2ц3б2
2ц3в2
2ц3г2
2ц3д2
2ц3ж2
2ц3з2
2ц3й2
2ц3к2
2ц3л2
2ц3м2
2ц3н2
2ц3п2
2ц3р2
2ц3с2
2ц3т2
2ц3ф2
2ц3х2
4ц3ц4
2ц3ч2
2ц3ш2
2ц3щ2
2ч3б2
2ч3в2
2ч3г2
2ч3д2
2ч3ж2
2ч3з2
2ч3й2
2ч3к2
2ч3л2
2ч3м2
2ч3н2
2ч3п2
2ч3р2
2ч3с2
2ч3т2
2ч3ф2
2ч3х2
2ч3ц2
4ч3ч4
2ч3ш2
2ч3щ2
2ш3б2
2ш3в2
2ш3г2
2ш3д2
2ш3ж2
2ш3з2
2ш3й2
2ш3к2
2ш3л2
2ш3м2
2ш3н2
2ш3п2
2ш3р2
2ш3с2
2ш3т2
2ш3ф2
2ш3х2
2ш3ц2
2ш3ч2
4ш3ш4
2ш3щ2
2щ3б2
2щ3в2
2щ3г2
2щ3д2
2щ3ж2
2щ3з2
2щ3й2
2щ3к2
2щ3л2
2щ3м2
2щ3н2
2щ3п2
2щ3р2
2щ3с2
2щ3т2
2щ3ф2
2щ3х2
2щ3ц2
2щ3ч2
2щ3ш2
4щ3щ4
1а1а1а4
1а1а1
аа1е4
аа1и4
аа1о4
аа1у4
аа1ъ4
аа1ю4
аа1я4
1а1е1а4
а1е1
а1е1е4
ае1и4
ае1о4
ае1у4
ае1ъ4
ае1ю4
ае1я4
1а1и1а4
а1и1
аи1е4
а1и1и4
аи1о4
аи1у4
аи1ъ4
аи1ю4
аи1я4
1а1о1а4
а1о1
ао1е4
ао1и4
а1о1о4
ао1у4
ао1ъ4
ао1ю4
ао1я4
1а1у1а4
а1у1
ау1е4
ау1и4
ау1о4
а1у1у4
ау1ъ4
ау1ю4
ау1я4
1а1ъ1а4
а1ъ1
аъ1е4
аъ1и4
аъ1о4
аъ1у4
а1ъ1ъ4
аъ1ю4
аъ1я4
1а1ю1а4
а1ю1
аю1е4
аю1и4
аю1о4
аю1у4
аю1ъ4
а1ю1ю4
аю1я4
1а1я1а4
а1я1
ая1е4
ая1и4
ая1о4
ая1у4
ая1ъ4
ая1ю4
а1я1я4
е1а1а4
е1а1
1е1а1е4
еа1и4
еа1о4
еа1у4
еа1ъ4
еа1ю4
еа1я4
ее1а4
1е1е1
1е1е1е4
ее1и4
ее1о4
ее1у4
ее1ъ4
ее1ю4
ее1я4
еи1а4
е1и1
1е1и1е4
е1и1и4
еи1о4
еи1у4
еи1ъ4
еи1ю4
еи1я4
ео1а4
е1о1
1е1о1е4
ео1и4
е1о1о4
ео1у4
ео1ъ4
ео1ю4
ео1я4
еу1а4
е1у1
1е1у1е4
еу1и4
еу1о4
е1у1у4
еу1ъ4
еу1ю4
еу1я4
еъ1а4
е1ъ1
1е1ъ1е4
еъ1и4
еъ1о4
еъ1у4
е1ъ1ъ4
еъ1ю4
еъ1я4
ею1а4
е1ю1
1е1ю1е4
ею1и4
ею1о4
ею1у4
ею1ъ4
е1ю1ю4
ею1я4
ея1а4
е1я1
1е1я1е4
ея1и4
ея1о4
ея1у4
ея1ъ4
ея1ю4
е1я1я4
и1а1а4
и1а1
иа1е4
1и1а1и4
иа1о4
иа1у4
иа1ъ4
иа1ю4
иа1я4
ие1а4
и1е1
и1е1е4
1и1е1и4
ие1о4
ие1у4
ие1ъ4
ие1ю4
ие1я4
ии1а4
1и1и1
ии1е4
1и1и1и4
ии1о4
ии1у4
ии1ъ4
ии1ю4
ии1я4
ио1а4
и1о1
ио1е4
1и1о1и4
и1о1о4
ио1у4
ио1ъ4
ио1ю4
ио1я4
иу1а4
и1у1
иу1е4
1и1у1и4
иу1о4
и1у1у4
иу1ъ4
иу1ю4
иу1я4
иъ1а4
и1ъ1
иъ1е4
1и1ъ1и4
иъ1о4
иъ1у4
и1ъ1ъ4
иъ1ю4
иъ1я4
ию1а4
и1ю1
ию1е4
1и1ю1и4
ию1о4
ию1у4
ию1ъ4
и1ю1ю4
ию1я4
ия1а4
и1я1
ия1е4
1и1я1и4
ия1о4
ия1у4
ия1ъ4
ия1ю4
и1я1я4
о1а1а4
о1а1
оа1е4
оа1и4
1о1а1о4
оа1у4
оа1ъ4
оа1ю4
оа1я4
ое1а4
о1е1
о1е1е4
ое1и4
1о1е1о4
ое1у4
ое1ъ4
ое1ю4
ое1я4
ои1а4
о1и1
ои1е4
о1и1и4
1о1и1о4
ои1у4
ои1ъ4
ои1ю4
ои1я4
оо1а4
1о1о1
оо1е4
оо1и4
1о1о1о4
оо1у4
оо1ъ4
оо1ю4
оо1я4
оу1а4
о1у1
оу1е4
оу1и4
1о1у1о4
о1у1у4
оу1ъ4
оу1ю4
оу1я4
оъ1а4
о1ъ1
оъ1е4
оъ1и4
1о1ъ1о4
оъ1у4
о1ъ1ъ4
оъ1ю4
оъ1я4
ою1а4
о1ю1
ою1е4
ою1и4
1о1ю1о4
ою1у4
ою1ъ4
о1ю1ю4
ою1я4
оя1а4
о1я1
оя1е4
оя1и4
1о1я1о4
оя1у4
оя1ъ4
оя1ю4
о1я1я4
у1а1а4
у1а1
уа1е4
уа1и4
уа1о4
1у1а1у4
уа1ъ4
уа1ю4
уа1я4
уе1а4
у1е1
у1е1е4
уе1и4
уе1о4
1у1е1у4
уе1ъ4
уе1ю4
уе1я4
уи1а4
у1и1
уи1е4
у1и1и4
уи1о4
1у1и1у4
уи1ъ4
уи1ю4
уи1я4
уо1а4
у1о1
уо1е4
уо1и4
у1о1о4
1у1о1у4
уо1ъ4
уо1ю4
уо1я4
уу1а4
1у1у1
уу1е4
уу1и4
уу1о4
1у1у1у4
уу1ъ4
уу1ю4
уу1я4
уъ1а4
у1ъ1
уъ1е4
уъ1и4
уъ1о4
1у1ъ1у4
у1ъ1ъ4
уъ1ю4
уъ1я4
ую1а4
у1ю1
ую1е4
ую1и4
ую1о4
1у1ю1у4
ую1ъ4
у1ю1ю4
ую1я4
уя1а4
у1я1
уя1е4
уя1и4
уя1о4
1у1я1у4
уя1ъ4
уя1ю4
у1я1я4
ъ1а1а4
ъ1а1
ъа1е4
ъа1и4
ъа1о4
ъа1у4
1ъ1а1ъ4
ъа1ю4
ъа1я4
ъе1а4
ъ1е1
ъ1е1е4
ъе1и4
ъе1о4
ъе1у4
1ъ1е1ъ4
ъе1ю4
ъе1я4
ъи1а4
ъ1и1
ъи1е4
ъ1и1и4
ъи1о4
ъи1у4
1ъ1и1ъ4
ъи1ю4
ъи1я4
ъо1а4
ъ1о1
ъо1е4
ъо1и4
ъ1о1о4
ъо1у4
1ъ1о1ъ4
ъо1ю4
ъо1я4
ъу1а4
ъ1у1
ъу1е4
ъу1и4
ъу1о4
ъ1у1у4
1ъ1у1ъ4
ъу1ю4
ъу1я4
ъъ1а4
1ъ1ъ1
ъъ1е4
ъъ1и4
ъъ1о4
ъъ1у4
1ъ1ъ1ъ4
ъъ1ю4
ъъ1я4
ъю1а4
ъ1ю1
ъю1е4
ъю1и4
ъю1о4
ъю1у4
1ъ1ю1ъ4
ъ1ю1ю4
ъю1я4
ъя1а4
ъ1я1
ъя1е4
ъя1и4
ъя1о4
ъя1у4
1ъ1я1ъ4
ъя1ю4
ъ1я1я4
ю1а1а4
ю1а1
юа1е4
юа1и4
юа1о4
юа1у4
юа1ъ4
1ю1а1ю4
юа1я4
юе1а4
ю1е1
ю1е1е4
юе1и4
юе1о4
юе1у4
юе1ъ4
1ю1е1ю4
юе1я4
юи1а4
ю1и1
юи1е4
ю1и1и4
юи1о4
юи1у4
юи1ъ4
1ю1и1ю4
юи1я4
юо1а4
ю1о1
юо1е4
юо1и4
ю1о1о4
юо1у4
юо1ъ4
1ю1о1ю4
юо1я4
юу1а4
ю1у1
юу1е4
юу1и4
юу1о4
ю1у1у4
юу1ъ4
1ю1у1ю4
юу1я4
юъ1а4
ю1ъ1
юъ1е4
юъ1и4
юъ1о4
юъ1у4
ю1ъ1ъ4
1ю1ъ1ю4
юъ1я4
юю1а4
1ю1ю1
юю1е4
юю1и4
юю1о4
юю1у4
юю1ъ4
1ю1ю1ю4
юю1я4
юя1а4
ю1я1
юя1е4
юя1и4
юя1о4
юя1у4
юя1ъ4
1ю1я1ю4
ю1я1я4
я1а1а4
я1а1
яа1е4
яа1и4
яа1о4
яа1у4
яа1ъ4
яа1ю4
1я1а1я4
яе1а4
я1е1
я1е1е4
яе1и4
яе1о4
яе1у4
яе1ъ4
яе1ю4
1я1е1я4
яи1а4
я1и1
яи1е4
я1и1и4
яи1о4
яи1у4
яи1ъ4
яи1ю4
1я1и1я4
яо1а4
я1о1
яо1е4
яо1и4
я1о1о4
яо1у4
яо1ъ4
яо1ю4
1я1о1я4
яу1а4
я1у1
яу1е4
яу1и4
яу1о4
я1у1у4
яу1ъ4
яу1ю4
1я1у1я4
яъ1а4
я1ъ1
яъ1е4
яъ1и4
яъ1о4
яъ1у4
я1ъ1ъ4
яъ1ю4
1я1ъ1я4
яю1а4
я1ю1
яю1е4
яю1и4
яю1о4
яю1у4
яю1ъ4
я1ю1ю4
1я1ю1я4
яя1а4
1я1я1
яя1е4
яя1и4
яя1о4
яя1у4
яя1ъ4
яя1ю4
1я1я1я4
й4б3б4
й4б3в2
й4б3г2
й4б3д2
й4б3ж2
й4б3з2
1й4б3й2
й4б3к2
й4б3л2
й4б3м2
й4б3н2
й4б3п2
й4б3р2
й4б3с2
й4б3т2
й4б3ф2
й4б3х2
й4б3ц2
й4б3ч2
й4б3ш2
й4б3щ2
й4в3б2
й4в3в4
й4в3г2
й4в3д2
й4в3ж2
й4в3з2
1й4в3й2
й4в3к2
й4в3л2
й4в3м2
й4в3н2
й4в3п2
й4в3р2
й4в3с2
й4в3т2
й4в3ф2
й4в3х2
й4в3ц2
й4в3ч2
й4в3ш2
й4в3щ2
й4г3б2
й4г3в2
й4г3г4
й4г3д2
й4г3ж2
й4г3з2
1й4г3й2
й4г3к2
й4г3л2
й4г3м2
й4г3н2
й4г3п2
й4г3р2
й4г3с2
й4г3т2
й4г3ф2
й4г3х2
й4г3ц2
й4г3ч2
й4г3ш2
й4г3щ2
й4д3б2
й4д3в2
й4д3г2
й4д3д4
й4д4ж1
й4д3з2
1й4д3й2
й4д3к2
й4д3л2
й4д3м2
й4д3н2
й4д3п2
й4д3р2
й4д3с2
й4д3т2
й4д3ф2
й4д3х2
й4д3ц2
й4д3ч2
й4д3ш2
й4д3щ2
й4ж3б2
й4ж3в2
й4ж3г2
й4ж3д2
й4ж3ж4
й4ж3з2
1й4ж3й2
й4ж3к2
й4ж3л2
й4ж3м2
й4ж3н2
й4ж3п2
й4ж3р2
й4ж3с2
й4ж3т2
й4ж3ф2
й4ж3х2
й4ж3ц2
й4ж3ч2
й4ж3ш2
й4ж3щ2
й4з3б2
й4з3в2
й4з3г2
й4з3д2
й4з3ж2
й4з3з4
1й4з3й2
й4з3к2
й4з3л2
й4з3м2
й4з3н2
й4з3п2
й4з3р2
й4з3с2
й4з3т2
й4з3ф2
й4з3х2
й4з3ц2
й4з3ч2
й4з3ш2
й4з3щ2
й4й3б2
й4й3в2
й4й3г2
й4й3д2
й4й3ж2
й4й3з2
4й4й4й4
й4й3к2
й4й3л2
й4й3м2
й4й3н2
й4й3п2
й4й3р2
й4й3с2
й4й3т2
й4й3ф2
й4й3х2
й4й3ц2
й4й3ч2
й4й3ш2
й4й3щ2
й4к3б2
й4к3в2
й4к3г2
й4к3д2
й4к3ж2
й4к3з2
1й4к3й2
й4к3к4
й4к3л2
й4к3м2
й4к3н2
й4к3п2
й4к3р2
й4к3с2
й4к3т2
й4к3ф2
й4к3х2
й4к3ц2
й4к3ч2
й4к3ш2
й4к3щ2
й4л3б2
й4л3в2
й4л3г2
й4л3д2
й4л3ж2
й4л3з2
1й4л3й2
й4л3к2
й4л3л4
й4л3м2
й4л3н2
й4л3п2
й4л3р2
й4л3с2
й4л3т2
й4л3ф2
й4л3х2
й4л3ц2
й4л3ч2
й4л3ш2
й4л3щ2
й4м3б2
й4м3в2
й4м3г2
й4м3д2
й4м3ж2
й4м3з2
1й4м3й2
й4м3к2
й4м3л2
й4м3м4
й4м3н2
й4м3п2
й4м3р2
й4м3с2
й4м3т2
й4м3ф2
й4м3х2
й4м3ц2
й4м3ч2
й4м3ш2
й4м3щ2
й4н3б2
й4н3в2
й4н3г2
й4н3д2
й4н3ж2
й4н3з2
1й4н3й2
й4н3к2
й4н3л2
й4н3м2
й4н3н4
й4н3п2
й4н3р2
й4н3с2
й4н3т2
й4н3ф2
й4н3х2
й4н3ц2
й4н3ч2
й4н3ш2
й4н3щ2
й4п3б2
й4п3в2
й4п3г2
й4п3д2
й4п3ж2
й4п3з2
1й4п3й2
й4п3к2
й4п3л2
й4п3м2
й4п3н2
й4п3п4
й4п3р2
й4п3с2
й4п3т2
й4п3ф2
й4п3х2
й4п3ц2
й4п3ч2
й4п3ш2
й4п3щ2
й4р3б2
й4р3в2
й4р3г2
й4р3д2
й4р3ж2
й4р3з2
1й4р3й2
й4р3к2
й4р3л2
й4р3м2
й4р3н2
й4р3п2
й4р3р4
й4р3с2
й4р3т2
й4р3ф2
й4р3х2
й4р3ц2
й4р3ч2
й4р3ш2
й4р3щ2
й4с3б2
й4с3в2
й4с3г2
й4с3д2
й4с3ж2
й4с3з2
1й4с3й2
й4с3к2
й4с3л2
й4с3м2
й4с3н2
й4с3п2
й4с3р2
й4с3с4
й4с3т2
й4с3ф2
й4с3х2
й4с3ц2
й4с3ч2
й4с3ш2
й4с3щ2
й4т3б2
й4т3в2
й4т3г2
й4т3д2
й4т3ж2
й4т3з2
1й4т3й2
й4т3к2
й4т3л2
й4т3м2
й4т3н2
й4т3п2
й4т3р2
й4т3с2
й4т3т4
й4т3ф2
й4т3х2
й4т3ц2
й4т3ч2
й4т3ш2
й4т3щ2
й4ф3б2
й4ф3в2
й4ф3г2
й4ф3д2
й4ф3ж2
й4ф3з2
1й4ф3й2
й4ф3к2
й4ф3л2
й4ф3м2
й4ф3н2
й4ф3п2
й4ф3р2
й4ф3с2
й4ф3т2
й4ф3ф4
й4ф3х2
й4ф3ц2
й4ф3ч2
й4ф3ш2
й4ф3щ2
й4х3б2
й4х3в2
й4х3г2
й4х3д2
й4х3ж2
й4х3з2
1й4х3й2
й4х3к2
й4х3л2
й4х3м2
й4х3н2
й4х3п2
й4х3р2
й4х3с2
й4х3т2
й4х3ф2
й4х3х4
й4х3ц2
й4х3ч2
й4х3ш2
й4х3щ2
й4ц3б2
й4ц3в2
й4ц3г2
й4ц3д2
й4ц3ж2
й4ц3з2
1й4ц3й2
й4ц3к2
й4ц3л2
й4ц3м2
й4ц3н2
й4ц3п2
й4ц3р2
й4ц3с2
й4ц3т2
й4ц3ф2
й4ц3х2
й4ц3ц4
й4ц3ч2
й4ц3ш2
й4ц3щ2
й4ч3б2
й4ч3в2
й4ч3г2
й4ч3д2
й4ч3ж2
й4ч3з2
1й4ч3й2
й4ч3к2
й4ч3л2
й4ч3м2
й4ч3н2
й4ч3п2
й4ч3р2
й4ч3с2
й4ч3т2
й4ч3ф2
й4ч3х2
й4ч3ц2
й4ч3ч4
й4ч3ш2
й4ч3щ2
й4ш3б2
й4ш3в2
й4ш3г2
й4ш3д2
й4ш3ж2
й4ш3з2
1й4ш3й2
й4ш3к2
й4ш3л2
й4ш3м2
й4ш3н2
й4ш3п2
й4ш3р2
й4ш3с2
й4ш3т2
й4ш3ф2
й4ш3х2
й4ш3ц2
й4ш3ч2
й4ш3ш4
й4ш3щ2
й4щ3б2
й4щ3в2
й4щ3г2
й4щ3д2
й4щ3ж2
й4щ3з2
1й4щ3й2
й4щ3к2
й4щ3л2
й4щ3м2
й4щ3н2
й4щ3п2
й4щ3р2
й4щ3с2
й4щ3т2
й4щ3ф2
й4щ3х2
й4щ3ц2
й4щ3ч2
й4щ3ш2
й4щ3щ4
б4ь
в4ь
г4ь
д4ь
ж4ь
з4ь
й4ь
к4ь
л4ь
м4ь
н4ь
п4ь
р4ь
с4ь
т4ь
ф4ь
х4ь
ц4ь
ч4ь
ш4ь
щ4ь
ь4ь
.д2з4в2
.д1
.д3з2
.д2ж4р2
.д4ж1
.д2ж4л2
.в2г4л2
.в1
.в3г2
.в2д4л2
.в3д2
.в2г4р2
.в2г4н2
.в2п4л2
.в3п2
.в2к4л2
.в3к2
.в2к4р2
.в2т4р2
.в3т2
.с2г4л2
.с1
.с3г2
.з2д4р2
.з1
.з3д2
.с2г4р2
.с2б4р2
.с3б2
.с2д4р2
.с3д2
.ж2д4р2
.ж1
.ж3д2
.с2к4л2
.с3к2
.с2п4л2
.с3п2
.с2п4р2
.с2т4р2
.с3т2
.с2к4р2
.ш2п4р2
.ш1
.ш3п2
.с2к4в2
.в2з4р2
.в3з2
.в2с4л2
.в3с2
.в2с4м2
.в2с4р2
.с2в4р2
.с3в2
.с2х4л2
.с3х2
.с2х4р2
.х2в4р2
.х1
.х3в2
.в2с4т2
.с2х4в2
.с2м4р2
.с3м2
н4кт.
н2к3т2
н4кс.
н2к3с2
к4ст.
к2с3т2
